North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 9. Authentication and Identification.

Rule 901.
Requirement of authentication or identification.

General provision. — The requirement of authentication or identification as a condition precedent to admissibility is satisfied by evidence sufficient to support a finding that the matter in question is what its proponent claims.

Illustrations. — By way of illustration only, and not by way of limitation, the following are examples of authentication or identification conforming with the requirements of this rule:

Testimony of Witness with Knowledge. — Testimony that a matter is what it is claimed to be.

Nonexpert Opinion on Handwriting. — Nonexpert opinion as to the genuineness of handwriting, based upon familiarity not acquired for purposes of the litigation.

Comparison by Trier or Expert Witness. — Comparison by the trier of fact or by expert witnesses with specimens which have been authenticated.

Distinctive Characteristics and the Like. — Appearance, contents, substance, internal patterns, or other distinctive characteristics, taken in conjunction with circumstances.

Voice Identification. — Identification of a voice, whether heard firsthand or through mechanical or electronic transmission or recording, by opinion based upon hearing the voice at any time under circumstances connecting it with the alleged speaker.

Telephone Conversations. — Telephone conversations, by evidence that a call was made to the number assigned at the time by the telephone company to a particular person or business, if (A) in the case of a person, circumstances, including self-identification, show the person answering to be the one called, or (B) in the case of a business, the call was made to a place of business and the conversation related to business reasonably transacted over the telephone.

Public Records or Reports. — Evidence that a writing authorized by law to be recorded or filed and in fact recorded or filed in a public office, or a purported public record, report, statement, or data compilation, in any form, is from the public office where items of this nature are kept.

Ancient Documents or Data Compilations. — Evidence that a document or data compilation, in any form, (A) is in such condition as to create no suspicion concerning its authenticity, (B) was in a place where it, if authentic, would likely be, and (C) has been in existence 20 years or more at the time it is offered.

Process or System. — Evidence describing a process or system used to produce a result and showing that the process or system produces an accurate result.

Methods Provided by Statute. — Any method of authentication or identification provided by statute.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 901 except that in example (10) the word “statute” is inserted in lieu of the phrase “Act of Congress or by other rules prescribed by the Supreme Court pursuant to statutory authority.”

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Subdivision (a). Authentication and identification represent a special aspect of relevancy. * * * Thus a telephone conversation may be irrelevant because on an unrelated topic or because the speaker is not identified. The latter aspect is the one here involved. Wigmore describes the need for authentication as “an inherent logical necessity.” 7 Wigmore § 2129, p. 564.

This requirement of showing authenticity or identity falls in the category of relevancy dependent upon fulfillment of a condition of fact and is governed by the procedure set forth in Rule 104(b).

The common law approach to authentication of documents has been criticized as an ‘attitude of agnosticism,’ McCormick, Cases on Evidence 388, n. 4 (3rd ed. 1956), as one which ‘departs sharply from men’s customs in ordinary affairs,’ and as presenting only a slight obstacle to the introduction of forgeries in comparison to the time and expense devoted to proving genuine writings which correctly show their origin on their face, McCormick § 185, pp. 395, 396. Today, such available procedures as requests to admit and pretrial conference afford the means of eliminating much of the need for authentication or identification. Also, significant inroads upon the traditional insistence on authentication and identification have been made by accepting as at least prima facie genuine items of the kind treated in Rule 902, infra. However, the need for suitable methods of proof still remains, since criminal cases pose their own obstacles to the use of preliminary procedures, unforeseen contingencies may arise, and cases of genuine controversy will still occur.”

Subdivision (a) is in accord with North Carolina practice.

With respect to subdivision (b), the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The treatment of authentication and identification draws largely upon the experience embodied in the common law and in statutes to furnish illustrative applications of the general principle set forth in subdivision (a). The examples are not intended as an exclusive enumeration of allowable methods but are meant to guide and suggest, leaving room for growth and development in this area of the law.

The examples relate for the most part to documents, with some attention given to voice communications and computer printouts. As Wigmore noted, no special rules have been developed for authenticating chattels. Wigmore, Code of Evidence § 2086 (3rd ed. 1942).

It should be observed that compliance with requirements of authentication or identification by no means assures admission of an item into evidence, as other bars, hearsay for example, may remain.

Example (1) contemplates a broad spectrum ranging from testimony of a witness who was present at the signing of a document to testimony establishing narcotics as taken from an accused and accounting for custody through the period until trial, including laboratory analysis.”

Example (1) is in accord with North Carolina practice.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Example (2) states conventional doctrine as to lay identification of handwriting, which recognizes that a sufficient familiarity with the handwriting of another person may be acquired by seeing him write, by exchanging correspondence, or by other means, to afford a basis for identifying it on subsequent occasions. McCormick § 189. * * * Testimony based upon familiarity acquired for purposes of the litigation is reserved to the expert under the example which follows.”

Example (2) is in accord with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 197 (1982).

Example (3) is comparison by the trier of fact or by expert witnesses with specimens that have been authenticated. In
State
v.

LeDuc,

306 N.C. 62

(1982), the Court permitted handwriting comparisons by the jury unaided by lay or expert testimony.

G.S. 8-40

, which should be repealed upon enactment of this rule, requires that the exemplar used for comparison be “proved to the satisfaction of the judge to be genuine”. However, the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The history of common law restrictions upon the technique of proving or disproving the genuineness of a disputed specimen of handwriting through comparison with a genuine specimen, by either the testimony of expert witnesses or direct viewing by the triers themselves, is detailed in 7 Wigmore §§ 1991-1994. In breaking away, the English Common Law Procedure Act of 1854, 17 and 18 Vict., c. 125, § 27, cautiously allowed expert or trier to use exemplars ‘proved to the satisfaction of the judge to be genuine’ for purposes of comparison. The language found its way into numerous statutes in this country, e.g., California Evidence Code §§ 1417, 1418. While explainable as a measure of prudence in the process of breaking with precedent in the handwriting situation, the reservation to the judge of the question of the genuineness of exemplars and the imposition of an unusually high standard of persuasion are at variance with the general treatment of relevancy which depends upon fulfillment of a condition of fact. Rule 104(b). No similar attitude is found in other comparison situations, e.g., ballistics comparison by jury . . . or by experts . . . and no reason appears for its continued existence in handwriting cases. Consequently Example (3) sets no higher standard for handwriting specimens and treats all comparison situations alike, to be governed by Rule 104(b).

Precedent supports the acceptance of visual comparison as sufficiently satisfying preliminary authentication requirements for admission in evidence. * * *

Example (4). The characteristics of the offered item itself, considered in the light of circumstances, afford authentication techniques in great variety. Thus a document or telephone conversation may be shown to have emanated from a particular person by virtue of its disclosing knowledge of facts known peculiarly to him . . .; similarly, a letter may be authenticated by content and circumstances indicating it was in reply to a duly authenticated one. * * * Language patterns may indicate authenticity or its opposite.”

Example (4) is in accord with North Carolina practice. See generally
Brandis, supra
, § 195, 236.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Example (5). Since aural voice identification is not a subject of expert testimony, the requisite familiarity may be acquired either before or after the particular speaking which is the subject of the identification, in this respect resembling visual identification of a person rather than identification of handwriting. Cf. Example (2),
supra.
”

Example (5) is in accord with North Carolina practice. See generally
Brandis, supra
, § 96.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Example (6). The cases are in agreement that a mere assertion of his identity by a person talking on the telephone is not sufficient evidence of the authenticity of the conversation and that additional evidence of his identity is required. The additional evidence need not fall in any set pattern. Thus the content of his statements or the reply technique, under Example (4),
supra,
or voice identification, under Example (5), may furnish the necessary foundation. Outgoing calls made by the witness involve additional factors bearing upon authenticity. The calling of a number assigned by the telephone company reasonably supports the assumption that the listing is correct and that the number is the one reached. If the number is that of a place of business, the mass of authority allows an ensuing conversation if it relates to business reasonably transacted over the telephone, on the theory that the maintenance of the telephone connection is an invitation to do business without further identification. Otherwise, some additional circumstance of identification of the speaker is required. The authorities divide on the question whether the self-identifying statement of the person answering suffices. Example (6) answers in the affirmative on the assumption that usual conduct respecting telephone calls furnish adequate assurances of regularity, bearing in mind that the entire matter is open to exploration before the trier of fact.”

Part (A) of Example (6) is in accord with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis, supra
, § 96. Part (B) permits identity to be established by evidence that the call was made to a place of business and the conversation related to business reasonably transacted over the telephone. There are no North Carolina cases directly on this point.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Example (7). Public records are regularly authenticated by proof of custody, without more. McCormick § 191; 7 Wigmore §§ 2158, 2159. The example extends the principle to include data stored in computers and similar methods, of which increasing use in the public records area may be expected.”

Example (7) is in accord with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis, supra
, § 195.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Example (8). The familiar ancient document rule of the common law is extended to include data stored electronically or by other similar means. Since the importance of appearance diminishes in this situation, the importance of custody or place where found increases correspondingly. This expansion is necessary in view of the widespread use of methods of storing data in forms other than conventional written records.

Any time period selected is bound to be arbitrary. The common law period of 30 years is here reduced to 20 years, with some shift of emphasis from the probable unavailability of witnesses to the unlikeliness of a still viable fraud after the lapse of time. * * *

The application of Example (8) is not subject to any limitation to title documents or to any requirement that possession, in the case of a title document, has been consistent with the document. See McCormick § 190.”

Example (8) is in accord with North Carolina practice, except that the period of 30 years is reduced to 20 years. See
Brandis, supra
, § 196.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Example (9) is designed for situations in which the accuracy of a result is dependent upon a process or system which produces it. X-rays afford a familiar instance. Among more recent developments is the computer. . . . Example (9) does not, of course, foreclose taking judicial notice of the accuracy of the process or system.”

Example (9) is in accord with North Carolina practice.

Example (10) makes clear that methods of authentication provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure or other statutes are not intended to be superseded. Illustrative are the provisions for authentication of official records in Civil Procedure Rule 44 and for the authentication of depositions in Civil Procedure Rule 30(f).

Rule 902.
Self-authentication.

Extrinsic evidence of authenticity as a condition precedent to admissibility is not required with respect to the following:

Domestic Public Documents Under Seal. — A document bearing a seal purporting to be that of the United States, or of any state, district, commonwealth, territory or insular possession thereof, or the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, or of a political subdivision, department, officer, or agency thereof, and a signature purporting to be an attestation or execution.

Domestic Public Documents Not Under Seal. — A document purporting to bear the signature in his official capacity of an officer or employee of any entity included in paragraph (1) hereof, having no seal, if a public officer having a seal and having official duties in the district or political subdivision of the officer or employee certifies under seal that the signer has the official capacity and that the signature is genuine.

Foreign Public Documents. — A document purporting to be executed or attested in his official capacity by a person authorized by the laws of a foreign country to make the execution or attestation, and accompanied by a final certification as to the genuineness of the signature and official position (A) of the executing or attesting person, or (B) of any foreign official whose certificate of genuineness of signature and official position relates to the execution or attestation or is in a chain of certificates of genuineness of signature and official position relating to the execution or attestation. A final certification may be made by a secretary of embassy or legation, consul general, consul, vice consul, or consular agent of the United States, or a diplomatic or consular official of the foreign country assigned or accredited to the United States. If reasonable opportunity has been given to all parties to investigate the authenticity and accuracy of official documents, the court may, for good cause shown, order that they be treated as presumptively authentic without final certification or permit them to be evidenced by an attested summary with or without final certification.

Certified Copies of Public Records. — A copy of an official record or report or entry therein, or of a document authorized by law to be recorded or filed and actually recorded or filed in a public office, including data compilations in any form, certified as correct by the custodian or other person authorized to make the certification, by certificate complying with paragraph (1), (2), or (3) or complying with any law of the United States or of this State.

Official Publications. — Books, pamphlets, or other publications purporting to be issued by public authority.

Newspapers and Periodicals. — Printed materials purporting to be newspapers or periodicals.

Trade Inscriptions and the Like. — Inscriptions, signs, tags, or labels purporting to have been affixed in the course of business and indicating ownership, control, or origin.

Acknowledged Documents. — Documents accompanied by a certificate of acknowledgment executed in the manner provided by law by a notary public or other officer authorized by law to take acknowledgments.

Commercial Paper and Related Documents. — Commercial paper, signatures thereon, and documents relating thereto to the extent provided by general commercial law.

Presumptions Created by Law. — Any signature, document, or other matter declared by any law of the United States or of this State to be presumptively or prima facie genuine or authentic.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule differs from Fed. R. Evid. 902 in that the phrase “or the Panama Canal Zone” has been deleted from paragraph (1). Paragraph (4) differs from the federal rule in that the phrase “any law of the United States or of this State” has been substituted in lieu of the phrase “of this Rule or complying with any Act of Congress or rule prescribed by the Supreme Court pursuant to statutory authority.” Paragraph (10) differs from the federal rule in that the phrase “any law of the United States or of this State” is used in lieu of the phrase “Act of Congress”.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Case law and statutes have, over the years, developed a substantial body of instances in which authenticity is taken as sufficiently established for purposes of admissibility without extrinsic evidence to that effect, sometimes for reasons of policy but perhaps more often because practical considerations reduce the possibility of unauthenticity to a very small dimension. The present rule collects and incorporates these situations, in some instances expanding them to occupy a larger area which their underlying considerations justify. In no instance is the opposite party foreclosed from disputing authenticity.”

Paragraph (1) provides that a document bearing the seal of an officer of the government and a signature purporting to be an attestation or execution does not require extrinsic evidence of authenticity as a condition precedent to admissibility. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 153, at 610 (1982). The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The acceptance of documents bearing a public seal and signature, most often encountered in practice in the form of acknowledgments or certificates authenticating copies of public records is actually of broad application. Whether theoretically based in whole or in part upon judicial notice, the practical underlying considerations are that forgery is a crime and detection is fairly easy and certain. 7 Wigmore § 2161, p. 638. . . .”

Paragraph (2) is derived from Federal Civil Procedure Rule 44. North Carolina Civil Procedure Rule 44, which is similar, should be amended to conform to Rule 902. Paragraph (2) applies to documents as well as public records. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“While statutes are found which raise a presumption of genuineness of purported official signatures in the absence of an official seal, 7 Wigmore § 2167 . . . the greater ease of effecting a forgery under these circumstances is apparent. Hence this paragraph of the rule calls for authentication by an officer who has a seal. Notarial acts by members of the armed forces and other special situations are covered in paragraph (10).”

Paragraph (3) is derived from Federal Civil Procedure Rule 44(a) (2), which was amended in 1966 to provide for greater clarity, efficiency, and flexibility in the procedure for authenticating copies of foreign official records. North Carolina Civil Procedure Rule 44 should be amended to conform to Rule 902. Paragraph (3) applies to public documents rather than being limited to public records.

Paragraph (4) is confined to official records and reports, and documents authorized to be recorded or filed and actually recorded or filed. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The common law and innumerable statutes have recognized the procedure of authenticating copies of public records by certificate. The certificate qualifies as a public document, receivable as authentic when in conformity with paragraphs (1), (2), or (3). * * * It will be observed that the certification procedure here provided extends only to public records, reports, and recorded documents, all including data compilations, and does not apply to public documents generally. Hence documents provable when presented in original form under paragraphs (1), (2), or (3) may not be provable by certified copy under paragraph (4).”

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 44,

G.S. 8-34

,

G.S. 8-35

,

G.S. 8-18

,

G.S. 8-20

,

G.S. 47-31

, and

G.S. 47-34

should be amended to conform to Rule 902.

Paragraph (5) has the same effect as North Carolina Civil Procedure Rule 44(a), which should be amended to conform to Rule 902. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Dispensing with preliminary proof of the genuineness of purportedly official publications, most commonly encountered in connection with statutes, court reports, rules, and regulations, has been greatly enlarged by statutes and decisions. 5 Wigmore § 1684. Paragraph (5), it will be noted, does not confer admissibility upon all official publications; it merely provides a means whereby their authenticity may be taken as established for purposes of admissibility. Rule 44(a) of the Rules of Civil Procedure has been to the same effect.”

Paragraph (6) changes North Carolina practice by providing that printed materials purporting to be newspapers or periodicals are self-authenticating. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The likelihood of forgery of newspapers or periodicals is slight indeed. Hence no danger is apparent in receiving them. Establishing the authenticity of the publication may, of course, leave still open questions of authority and responsibility for items therein contained. See 7 Wigmore § 2150.”

Paragraph (7) changes North Carolina practice by providing that inscriptions, signs, tags, or labels purporting to have been affixed in the course of business and indicating ownership, control, or origin are self-authenticating. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Several factors justify dispensing with preliminary proof of genuineness of commercial and mercantile labels and the like. The risk of forgery is minimal. Trademark infringement involves serious penalties. Great efforts are devoted to inducing the public to buy in reliance on brand names, and substantial protection is given them.”

Paragraph (8) extends the exception for acknowledged title documents to include other acknowledged documents. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“In virtually every state, acknowledged title documents are receivable in evidence without further proof. Statutes are collected in 5 Wigmore § 1676. If this authentication suffices for documents of the importance of those affecting titles, logic scarcely permits denying this method when other kinds of documents are involved.”

Paragraph (9) provides that commercial paper, signatures thereon, and documents relating thereto are authenticated to the extent provided by general commercial law. The term “general commercial law” refers to the Uniform Commercial Code, except that federal commercial law will apply when federal commercial paper is involved. Pertinent provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code are §§ 25-1-202, 25-3-307, and 25-3-510, dealing with third-party documents, signatures on negotiable instruments, protests, and statements of dishonor.

Paragraph (10) provides for the authentication of any signature, document, or other matter declared by any federal or North Carolina statute to be presumptively or prima facie genuine or authentic.

Rule 903.
Subscribing witness’ testimony unnecessary.

The testimony of a subscribing witness is not necessary to authenticate a writing unless required by the laws of the jurisdiction whose laws govern the validity of the writing.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 903.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The common law required that attesting witnesses be produced or accounted for. Today the requirement has generally been abolished except with respect to documents which must be attested to be valid, e.g., wills in some states.”

The requirement of proof by the attesting witness was abolished by

G.S. 8-38

, which should be repealed upon enactment of Rule 903. Rule 903 is not intended to affect the method and manner of proving instruments for registration.